New York, session 2025-2026, S10629.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act enacts into law legislation necessary to implement 2 collective bargaining agreements and to implement changes to salary and 3 benefits for certain state officers and employees excluded from collec- 4 tive negotiating units. Each component is wholly contained within a Part 5 identified as Parts A through B. The effective date for each particular 6 provision contained within such Part is set forth in the last section of 7 such Part. Any provision in any section contained within a Part, includ- 8 ing the effective date of the Part, which makes reference to a section 9 "of this act", when used in connection with that particular component, 10 shall be deemed to mean and refer to the corresponding section of the 11 Part in which it is found. Section two of this act sets forth the gener- 12 al severability clause applicable to this act. Section three of this act 13 sets forth the general effective date of this act. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12046-01-6 S. 10629 2 1 PART A 2 SALARIES AND BENEFITS FOR CERTAIN STATE 3 OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES IN THE ADMINISTRATIVE, INSTITUTIONAL, OPERATIONAL 4 AND DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS UNITS 2026-2031 5 Section 1. Subparagraphs 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 of paragraph a of subdivi- 6 sion 1 of section 130 of the civil service law are REPEALED and five new 7 subparagraphs 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 are added to read as follows: 8 (1) Effective March twenty-sixth, two thousand twenty-six for officers 9 and employees on the administrative payroll and effective April second, 10 two thousand twenty-six for officers and employees on the institutional 11 payroll: 12 SG HR STEP 1 STEP 2 STEP 3 STEP 4 STEP 5 STEP 6 JR INCR 13 1 30079 31093 32107 33121 34135 35149 36163 37177 1014 14 2 31227 32293 33359 34425 35491 36557 37623 38689 1066 15 3 32787 33899 35011 36123 37235 38347 39459 40571 1112 16 4 34220 35398 36576 37754 38932 40110 41288 42466 1178 17 5 35856 37088 38320 39552 40784 42016 43248 44480 1232 18 6 37862 39145 40428 41711 42994 44277 45560 46843 1283 19 7 39956 41300 42644 43988 45332 46676 48020 49364 1344 20 8 42209 43605 45001 46397 47793 49189 50585 51981 1396 21 9 44560 46019 47478 48937 50396 51855 53314 54773 1459 22 10 47110 48639 50168 51697 53226 54755 56284 57813 1529 23 11 49841 51446 53051 54656 56261 57866 59471 61076 1605 24 12 52694 54355 56016 57677 59338 60999 62660 64321 1661 25 13 55817 57556 59295 61034 62773 64512 66251 67990 1739 26 14 59049 60859 62669 64479 66289 68099 69909 71719 1810 27 15 62477 64364 66251 68138 70025 71912 73799 75686 1887 28 16 65977 67951 69925 71899 73873 75847 77821 79795 1974 29 17 69691 71776 73861 75946 78031 80116 82201 84286 2085 30 18 73717 75896 78075 80254 82433 84612 86791 88970 2179 31 19 77666 79954 82242 84530 86818 89106 91394 93682 2288 32 20 81729 84104 86479 88854 91229 93604 95979 98354 2375 33 21 86111 88597 91083 93569 96055 98541 101027 103513 2486 34 22 90728 93327 95926 98525 101124 103723 106322 108921 2599 35 23 95580 98295 101010 103725 106440 109155 111870 114585 2715 36 24 100783 103591 106399 109207 112015 114823 117631 120439 2808 37 25 106351 109283 112215 115147 118079 121011 123943 126875 2932 38 (2) Effective March twenty-fifth, two thousand twenty-seven for offi- 39 cers and employees on the administrative payroll and effective April 40 first, two thousand twenty-seven for officers and employees on the 41 institutional payroll: 42 SG HR STEP 1 STEP 2 STEP 3 STEP 4 STEP 5 STEP 6 JR INCR 43 1 31282 32337 33392 34447 35502 36557 37612 38667 1055 44 2 32476 33585 34694 35803 36912 38021 39130 40239 1109 45 3 34098 35255 36412 37569 38726 39883 41040 42197 1157 46 4 35589 36814 38039 39264 40489 41714 42939 44164 1225 47 5 37290 38571 39852 41133 42414 43695 44976 46257 1281 48 6 39376 40710 42044 43378 44712 46046 47380 48714 1334 49 7 41554 42952 44350 45748 47146 48544 49942 51340 1398 50 8 43897 45349 46801 48253 49705 51157 52609 54061 1452 S. 10629 3 1 9 46342 47859 49376 50893 52410 53927 55444 56961 1517 2 10 48994 50584 52174 53764 55354 56944 58534 60124 1590 3 11 51835 53504 55173 56842 58511 60180 61849 63518 1669 4 12 54802 56529 58256 59983 61710 63437 65164 66891 1727 5 13 58050 59859 61668 63477 65286 67095 68904 70713 1809 6 14 61411 63293 65175 67057 68939 70821 72703 74585 1882 7 15 64976 66938 68900 70862 72824 74786 76748 78710 1962 8 16 68616 70669 72722 74775 76828 78881 80934 82987 2053 9 17 72479 74647 76815 78983 81151 83319 85487 87655 2168 10 18 76666 78932 81198 83464 85730 87996 90262 92528 2266 11 19 80773 83152 85531 87910 90289 92668 95047 97426 2379 12 20 84998 87468 89938 92408 94878 97348 99818 102288 2470 13 21 89555 92141 94727 97313 99899 102485 105071 107657 2586 14 22 94357 97060 99763 102466 105169 107872 110575 113278 2703 15 23 99403 102227 105051 107875 110699 113523 116347 119171 2824 16 24 104814 107734 110654 113574 116494 119414 122334 125254 2920 17 25 110605 113654 116703 119752 122801 125850 128899 131948 3049 18 (3) Effective April sixth, two thousand twenty-eight for officers and 19 employees on the administrative payroll and effective March thirtieth, 20 two thousand twenty-eight for officers and employees on the institu- 21 tional payroll: 22 SG HR STEP 1 STEP 2 STEP 3 STEP 4 STEP 5 STEP 6 JR INCR 23 1 32377 33469 34561 35653 36745 37837 38929 40021 1092 24 2 33613 34761 35909 37057 38205 39353 40501 41649 1148 25 3 35291 36489 37687 38885 40083 41281 42479 43677 1198 26 4 36835 38103 39371 40639 41907 43175 44443 45711 1268 27 5 38595 39921 41247 42573 43899 45225 46551 47877 1326 28 6 40754 42135 43516 44897 46278 47659 49040 50421 1381 29 7 43008 44455 45902 47349 48796 50243 51690 53137 1447 30 8 45433 46936 48439 49942 51445 52948 54451 55954 1503 31 9 47964 49534 51104 52674 54244 55814 57384 58954 1570 32 10 50709 52355 54001 55647 57293 58939 60585 62231 1646 33 11 53649 55376 57103 58830 60557 62284 64011 65738 1727 34 12 56720 58507 60294 62081 63868 65655 67442 69229 1787 35 13 60082 61954 63826 65698 67570 69442 71314 73186 1872 36 14 63560 65508 67456 69404 71352 73300 75248 77196 1948 37 15 67250 69281 71312 73343 75374 77405 79436 81467 2031 38 16 71018 73143 75268 77393 79518 81643 83768 85893 2125 39 17 75016 77260 79504 81748 83992 86236 88480 90724 2244 40 18 79349 81694 84039 86384 88729 91074 93419 95764 2345 41 19 83600 86062 88524 90986 93448 95910 98372 100834 2462 42 20 87973 90529 93085 95641 98197 100753 103309 105865 2556 43 21 92689 95366 98043 100720 103397 106074 108751 111428 2677 44 22 97659 100457 103255 106053 108851 111649 114447 117245 2798 45 23 102882 105805 108728 111651 114574 117497 120420 123343 2923 46 24 108482 111504 114526 117548 120570 123592 126614 129636 3022 47 25 114476 117632 120788 123944 127100 130256 133412 136568 3156 48 (4) Effective April fifth, two thousand twenty-nine for officers and 49 employees on the administrative payroll and effective March twenty- 50 ninth, two thousand twenty-nine for officers and employees on the insti- 51 tutional payroll: 52 SG HR STEP 1 STEP 2 STEP 3 STEP 4 STEP 5 STEP 6 JR INCR S. 10629 4 1 1 33348 34473 35598 36723 37848 38973 40098 41223 1125 2 2 34621 35803 36985 38167 39349 40531 41713 42895 1182 3 3 36350 37584 38818 40052 41286 42520 43754 44988 1234 4 4 37940 39246 40552 41858 43164 44470 45776 47082 1306 5 5 39753 41119 42485 43851 45217 46583 47949 49315 1366 6 6 41977 43399 44821 46243 47665 49087 50509 51931 1422 7 7 44298 45788 47278 48768 50258 51748 53238 54728 1490 8 8 46796 48344 49892 51440 52988 54536 56084 57632 1548 9 9 49403 51020 52637 54254 55871 57488 59105 60722 1617 10 10 52230 53925 55620 57315 59010 60705 62400 64095 1695 11 11 55258 57037 58816 60595 62374 64153 65932 67711 1779 12 12 58422 60263 62104 63945 65786 67627 69468 71309 1841 13 13 61884 63812 65740 67668 69596 71524 73452 75380 1928 14 14 65467 67473 69479 71485 73491 75497 77503 79509 2006 15 15 69268 71360 73452 75544 77636 79728 81820 83912 2092 16 16 73149 75338 77527 79716 81905 84094 86283 88472 2189 17 17 77266 79577 81888 84199 86510 88821 91132 93443 2311 18 18 81729 84144 86559 88974 91389 93804 96219 98634 2415 19 19 86108 88644 91180 93716 96252 98788 101324 103860 2536 20 20 90612 93245 95878 98511 101144 103777 106410 109043 2633 21 21 95470 98227 100984 103741 106498 109255 112012 114769 2757 22 22 100589 103471 106353 109235 112117 114999 117881 120763 2882 23 23 105968 108979 111990 115001 118012 121023 124034 127045 3011 24 24 111736 114849 117962 121075 124188 127301 130414 133527 3113 25 25 117910 121161 124412 127663 130914 134165 137416 140667 3251 26 (5) Effective April fourth, two thousand thirty for officers and 27 employees on the administrative payroll and effective March twenty- 28 eighth, two thousand thirty for officers and employees on the institu- 29 tional payroll: 30 SG HR STEP 1 STEP 2 STEP 3 STEP 4 STEP 5 STEP 6 JR INCR 31 1 34348 35507 36666 37825 38984 40143 41302 42461 1159 32 2 35660 36877 38094 39311 40528 41745 42962 44179 1217 33 3 37441 38712 39983 41254 42525 43796 45067 46338 1271 34 4 39078 40423 41768 43113 44458 45803 47148 48493 1345 35 5 40946 42353 43760 45167 46574 47981 49388 50795 1407 36 6 43236 44701 46166 47631 49096 50561 52026 53491 1465 37 7 45627 47162 48697 50232 51767 53302 54837 56372 1535 38 8 48200 49794 51388 52982 54576 56170 57764 59358 1594 39 9 50885 52551 54217 55883 57549 59215 60881 62547 1666 40 10 53797 55543 57289 59035 60781 62527 64273 66019 1746 41 11 56916 58748 60580 62412 64244 66076 67908 69740 1832 42 12 60175 62071 63967 65863 67759 69655 71551 73447 1896 43 13 63741 65727 67713 69699 71685 73671 75657 77643 1986 44 14 67431 69497 71563 73629 75695 77761 79827 81893 2066 45 15 71346 73501 75656 77811 79966 82121 84276 86431 2155 46 16 75343 77598 79853 82108 84363 86618 88873 91128 2255 47 17 79584 81964 84344 86724 89104 91484 93864 96244 2380 48 18 84181 86668 89155 91642 94129 96616 99103 101590 2487 49 19 88691 91303 93915 96527 99139 101751 104363 106975 2612 50 20 93330 96042 98754 101466 104178 106890 109602 112314 2712 51 21 98334 101174 104014 106854 109694 112534 115374 118214 2840 52 22 103607 106575 109543 112511 115479 118447 121415 124383 2968 53 23 109147 112248 115349 118450 121551 124652 127753 130854 3101 S. 10629 5 1 24 115088 118294 121500 124706 127912 131118 134324 137530 3206 2 25 121447 124796 128145 131494 134843 138192 141541 144890 3349 3 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 208 of the civil service law, as amended 4 by section 2 of part A of chapter 361 of the laws of 2022, is amended to 5 read as follows: 6 2. An employee organization certified or recognized pursuant to this 7 article shall be entitled to unchallenged representation status until 8 seven months prior to the expiration of a written agreement between the 9 public employer and said employee organization determining terms and 10 conditions of employment. For the purposes of this subdivision, (a) any 11 such agreement for a term covering other than the fiscal year of the 12 public employer shall be deemed to expire with the fiscal year ending 13 immediately prior to the termination date of such agreement, (b) any 14 such agreement having a term in excess of three years shall be treated 15 as an agreement for a term of three years, provided, however, any such 16 agreement between the state and an employee organization representing 17 employees in the executive or judicial branches which commences in the 18 calendar year two thousand [twenty-one] twenty-six having a term in 19 excess of three years shall be treated as an agreement for a term 20 certain specified in such agreement but in no event for a term greater 21 than four years, and (c) extensions of any such agreement shall not 22 extend the period of unchallenged representation status. 23 § 3. Subdivision 12-d of section 8 of the state finance law, as 24 amended by section 4 of part A of chapter 361 of the laws of 2022, is 25 amended to read as follows: 26 12-d. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the court of 27 claims act, examine, audit and certify for payment any claim submitted 28 and approved by the head of a state department or agency, other than a 29 department or agency specified in subdivision twelve of this section, 30 for personal property of an employee damaged or destroyed in the course 31 of the performance of official duties without fault on [his or her] 32 their part by an incarcerated individual, patient or client of such 33 department or agency after March thirty-first, two thousand [twenty-one] 34 twenty-six and prior to April first, two thousand [twenty-six] thirty- 35 one, provided no such claim may be certified for payment to an officer 36 or employee who is in a collective negotiating unit until the director 37 of employee relations shall deliver to the comptroller a letter that 38 there is in effect with respect to such negotiating unit a written 39 collectively negotiated agreement with the state pursuant to article 40 fourteen of the civil service law which provides therefor. Payment of 41 any such claim shall not exceed the sum of three hundred dollars. No 42 person submitting a claim under this subdivision shall have any claim 43 for damages to such personal property approved pursuant to the provision 44 of subdivision four of section five hundred thirty of the labor law or 45 any other applicable provision of law. 46 § 4. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 12-e of section 8 of the state 47 finance law, as amended by section 5 of part A of chapter 361 of the 48 laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 49 (a) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the court of claims 50 act, where, and to the extent that, an agreement between the state and 51 an employee organization entered into pursuant to article fourteen of 52 the civil service law on behalf of officers and employees serving in 53 positions in the administrative services unit, institutional services 54 unit, operational services unit or division of military and naval 55 affairs unit so provides, examine, audit and certify for payment any S. 10629 6 1 claim submitted and approved by the head of a state department or agency 2 for personal property of an officer or employee damaged or destroyed in 3 the actual performance of official duties without fault or negligence of 4 the officer or employee other than a claim specified and covered by 5 subdivision twelve or twelve-d of this section after March thirty-first, 6 two thousand [twenty-one] twenty-six and prior to April first, two thou- 7 sand [twenty-six] thirty-one. Payment of such claim shall not exceed 8 the sum of [three hundred fifty] six hundred dollars. Where an agreement 9 between the state and such employee organization entered into pursuant 10 to article fourteen of the civil service law provides for payment to be 11 made to officers and employees by a state department or agency, such 12 payments for claims not in excess of the amount specified in subdivision 13 three of section one hundred fifteen of this chapter may be made from a 14 petty cash account established pursuant to section one hundred fifteen 15 of this chapter and in the manner prescribed therein and pursuant to 16 regulations of the comptroller. No person submitting a claim under this 17 subdivision shall have any claim for damages to such personal property 18 approved pursuant to the provisions of subdivision four of section five 19 hundred thirty of the labor law or any other applicable provision of 20 law. 21 § 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when, in the adminis- 22 trative services unit, the institutional services unit, the operational 23 services unit or the division of military and naval affairs unit, a 24 determination has been implemented to increase the hiring salary of a 25 position in accordance with subdivision 4 of section 130 of the civil 26 service law, incumbents of such positions who are employed in any state 27 department, state institution or other state agency, in the particular 28 area or areas or location or locations affected, who did not receive the 29 benefit of the new hiring salary or have their salaries brought up to 30 such new hiring salary may receive increased compensation as determined 31 by an agreement between the office of employee relations and the employ- 32 ee organization representing such units. 33 § 6. Compensation for certain state officers and employees in collec- 34 tive negotiating units. 1. The provisions of this section shall apply, 35 except as otherwise stated in this section, to all full-time officers 36 and employees in the collective negotiating units designated as the 37 administrative services unit, the institutional services unit, the oper- 38 ational services unit, or the division of military and naval affairs 39 unit established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law. 40 2. Effective March 26, 2026 for officers and employees on the adminis- 41 trative payroll and effective April 2, 2026 for officers and employees 42 on the institutional payroll, the basic annual salary of officers and 43 employees in full-time annual salaried employment status on the day 44 before such payroll period shall be increased by four and one-half 45 percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar amount. 46 3. Effective March 25, 2027 for officers and employees on the adminis- 47 trative payroll and effective April 1, 2027 for officers and employees 48 on the institutional payroll, the basic annual salary of officers and 49 employees in full-time annual salaried employment status on the day 50 before such payroll period shall be increased by four percent adjusted 51 to the nearest whole dollar amount. 52 4. Effective April 6, 2028 for officers and employees on the adminis- 53 trative payroll and effective March 30, 2028 for officers and employees 54 on the institutional payroll, the basic annual salary of officers and 55 employees in full-time annual salaried employment status on the day S. 10629 7 1 before such payroll period shall be increased by three and one-half 2 percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar amount. 3 5. Effective April 5, 2029 for officers and employees on the adminis- 4 trative payroll and effective March 29, 2029 for officers and employees 5 on the institutional payroll, the basic annual salary of officers and 6 employees in full-time annual salaried employment status on the day 7 before such payroll period shall be increased by three percent adjusted 8 to the nearest whole dollar amount. 9 6. Effective April 4, 2030 for officers and employees on the adminis- 10 trative payroll and effective March 28, 2030 for officers and employees 11 on the institutional payroll, the basic annual salary of officers and 12 employees in full-time annual salaried employment status on the day 13 before such payroll period shall be increased by three percent adjusted 14 to the nearest whole dollar amount. 15 7. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions two, three, four, 16 five and six of this section, if the basic annual salary of an officer 17 or employee to whom the provisions of this section apply is identical 18 with the hiring rate, step one, two, three, four, five, six or job rate 19 of the salary grade of their position on the effective dates of the 20 increases provided in these subdivisions, such basic annual salary shall 21 be increased to the hiring rate, step one, two, three, four, five, six 22 or job rate, respectively, of such salary grade as contained in the 23 appropriate salary schedules in subparagraphs 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 of para- 24 graph a of subdivision 1 of section 130 of the civil service law, as 25 added by section one of this act, to take effect on the dates provided 26 in such subparagraphs 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5, respectively. The increases in 27 basic annual salary provided by this subdivision shall be in lieu of any 28 increase in basic annual salary provided for in subdivisions two, three, 29 four, five and six of this section. 30 8. Payments pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 6 of section 131 31 of the civil service law for full-time annual salaried officers and 32 employees entitled to such payments to whom the provisions of this 33 section apply shall be payable in accordance with the terms of an agree- 34 ment reached pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law between the 35 state and an employee organization representing employees subject to the 36 provisions of this section. 37 9. If an unencumbered position is one which if encumbered, would be 38 subject to the provisions of this section, the salary of such position 39 shall be increased by the salary increase amounts specified in this 40 section. If a position is created and filled by the appointment of an 41 officer or employee who is subject to the provisions of this section, 42 the salary otherwise provided for such position shall be increased in 43 the same manner as though such position had been in existence but unen- 44 cumbered. 45 10. The increases in salary provided in subdivisions two, three, four, 46 five and six of this section, shall apply on a prorated basis to offi- 47 cers and employees, otherwise eligible to receive an increase in salary, 48 who are paid on an hourly or per diem basis, employees serving on a 49 part-time or seasonal basis and employees paid on any basis other than 50 at an annual salary rate. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the provisions 51 of subdivision eight of this section shall not apply to employees serv- 52 ing on an hourly, per diem, or seasonal basis, except as determined by 53 the director of the budget. 54 11. In order to provide for the officers and employees to whom this 55 section applies who are not allocated to salary grades, but are paid on 56 an annual basis, increases and payments pursuant to subdivision eight of S. 10629 8 1 this section in proportion to those provided to persons to whom this 2 section applies who are allocated to salary grades, the director of the 3 budget is authorized to add appropriate adjustments and/or payments to 4 the compensation which such officers and employees are otherwise enti- 5 tled to receive. The director of the budget shall issue certificates 6 which shall contain schedules of positions and the salaries and/or 7 payments thereof for which adjustments and/or payments are made pursuant 8 to the provisions of this subdivision, and a copy of each such certif- 9 icate shall be filed with the state comptroller, the state department of 10 civil service, the chair of the senate finance committee and the chair 11 of the assembly ways and means committee. 12 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the 13 provisions of this section shall not apply to officers or employees paid 14 on a fee schedule basis. 15 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any increase 16 in compensation for any officer or employee appointed to a lower graded 17 position from a redeployment list pursuant to subdivision 1 of section 18 79 of the civil service law who continues to receive their former salary 19 pursuant to such subdivision shall be determined on the basis of such 20 lower graded position provided, however, that the increases in salary 21 provided in this section shall not cause such officer's or employee's 22 salary to exceed the job rate of such lower graded position. 23 14. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section or 24 of any law to the contrary, the director of the budget may reduce the 25 salary of any position which is vacant or which becomes vacant, so long 26 as the position, if encumbered, would be subject to the provisions of 27 this section. The director of the budget does not need to provide a 28 reason for such reduction. 29 15. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section or 30 of any law to the contrary, any increase in compensation may be withheld 31 in whole or in part from any employee to whom the provisions of this 32 section are applicable when, in the opinion of the director of the budg- 33 et and the director of employee relations, such increase is not 34 warranted or is not appropriate for any reason. 35 § 7. Compensation for certain employees of the contract colleges at 36 Cornell and Alfred universities. 1. During the period April 1, 2026 to 37 March 31, 2031, the basic annual salaries of positions in the nonprofes- 38 sional service, except those positions in the Cornell service and main- 39 tenance unit which are subject to the terms of a collective bargaining 40 agreement between Cornell University and the employee organization 41 representing employees in such positions and except those positions in 42 the Alfred service and maintenance unit which are subject to the terms 43 of a collective bargaining agreement between Alfred University and the 44 employee organization representing employees in such positions, in 45 institutions under the management and control of Cornell and Alfred 46 universities as representatives of the board of trustees of the state 47 university may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state 48 university trustees. Such plans may include new salary schedules which 49 shall supersede the salary schedules then in effect applicable to such 50 employees. Such increases in basic annual salary rates, exclusive of 51 performance advancement payments or merit recognition payments, shall 52 not exceed in the aggregate the payments provided in subdivisions two, 53 three, four, five and six of section six of this act, for incumbents of 54 positions subject to this subdivision. Such plans may provide, within 55 the appropriations available therefor, an amount for distribution in 56 whole or in part for meritorious service by Cornell and Alfred universi- S. 10629 9 1 ties, in their discretion, with the approval of the state university 2 trustees to the incumbents of such positions. 3 2. For the purposes of this section, the basic annual salary of 4 employees is that salary which is obtained through direct appropriation 5 of state moneys for the purpose of paying wages. Nothing in this section 6 shall prevent payment of additional amounts to incumbents of such posi- 7 tions in the nonprofessional service in addition to the basic annual 8 salary; provided, however, that the amounts required for such additional 9 payment, and the cost of fringe benefits attributable to such payment, 10 as determined by the comptroller, are made available to the state in 11 accordance with the procedures established by the state university for 12 such purposes. 13 3. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, any 14 increase in compensation provided by this section may be withheld in 15 whole or in part from any officer or employee when, in the opinion of 16 the director of the budget, such withholding is necessary to reflect the 17 job performance of such officer or employee, or to maintain appropriate 18 salary relationships among officers or employees of the state, or to 19 reduce state expenditures to acceptable levels, or when such increase is 20 not warranted or is not appropriate for any reason and the salary of 21 such officer or employee is set at the discretion of the appointing 22 authority. 23 4. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subdivision, act 24 or any other provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the 25 contract colleges at Cornell and Alfred universities are authorized to 26 provide for a procedure for the repayment of salaries withheld from 27 incumbents of positions subject to this subdivision as described in 28 subdivision one of this section, pursuant to subdivision 2-a of section 29 200 of the state finance law in lieu of the lump sum payment authorized 30 by subparagraph 3 of paragraph (a) of such subdivision, subject to the 31 approval of the state university trustees. Further, Cornell and Alfred 32 universities are authorized to provide that the salary of employees 33 newly hired on or after September 1, 1992 shall not be subject to the 34 provisions of subdivision 2-a of section 200 of the state finance law. 35 § 8. Location compensation for certain state officers and employees in 36 collective negotiating units. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 37 provisions of law, full-time annual salaried officers and employees, as 38 well as non-annual salaried seasonal officers and employees who shall 39 receive the compensation provided for pursuant to this section on a 40 prorated basis, except non-annual salaried officers and employees who 41 are not seasonal, in the collective negotiating units designated as the 42 administrative services unit, the institutional services unit, the oper- 43 ational services unit, or the division of military and naval affairs 44 unit established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, whose 45 principal place of employment or, in the case of a field employee, whose 46 official station as determined in accordance with the regulations of the 47 comptroller is located: (1) in the county of Monroe and who were eligi- 48 ble to receive location pay on March 31, 1985, shall receive location 49 pay at the rate of $200 per year provided they continue to be otherwise 50 eligible; (2) in the city of New York, or in the county of Rockland, 51 Westchester, Nassau or Suffolk shall, effective April 1, 2025, continue 52 to receive a downstate adjustment at the annual rate of $4,000; or (3) 53 in the county of Dutchess, Putnam or Orange shall, effective April 1, 54 2025, continue to receive a mid-Hudson adjustment at the annual rate of 55 $2,000. Effective April 1, 2026, in the city of New York, or in the 56 county of Rockland, Westchester, Nassau or Suffolk such amount shall S. 10629 10 1 increase to an annual rate of $4,150; and in the county of Dutchess, 2 Putnam, Orange or Ulster such amount shall increase to an annual rate of 3 $2,150. Effective April 1, 2027, in the city of New York, or in the 4 county of Rockland, Westchester, Nassau or Suffolk such amount shall 5 increase to an annual rate of $4,316; and in the county of Dutchess, 6 Putnam, Orange or Ulster such amount shall increase to an annual rate of 7 $2,236. Effective April 1, 2028, in the city of New York, or in the 8 county of Rockland, Westchester, Nassau or Suffolk such amount shall 9 increase to an annual rate of $4,467; and in the county of Dutchess, 10 Putnam, Orange or Ulster such amount shall increase to an annual rate of 11 $2,314. Effective April 1, 2029, in the city of New York, or in the 12 county of Rockland, Westchester, Nassau or Suffolk such amount shall 13 increase to an annual rate of $4,601; and in the county of Dutchess, 14 Putnam, Orange or Ulster such amount shall increase to an annual rate of 15 $2,383. Effective April 1, 2030, in the city of New York, or in the 16 county of Rockland, Westchester, Nassau or Suffolk such amount shall 17 increase to an annual rate of $4,739; and in the county of Dutchess, 18 Putnam, Orange or Ulster such amount shall increase to an annual rate of 19 $2,454. Such location payments shall be in addition to and shall not be 20 a part of an officer's or employee's basic annual salary, and shall not 21 affect or impair any performance advancements or other rights or bene- 22 fits to which an officer or employee may be entitled by law, provided, 23 however, that location payments shall be included as compensation for 24 purposes of computation of overtime pay and for retirement purposes. For 25 the sole purpose of continuing eligibility for location pay in Monroe 26 county, an officer or employee previously eligible to receive location 27 pay on March 31, 1985 who is on an approved leave of absence or partic- 28 ipates in an employer program to reduce to part-time service during 29 summer months shall continue to be eligible for said location pay upon 30 return to full-time state service in Monroe county. 31 § 9. Continuation of location compensation for certain officers and 32 employees of the Hudson Valley developmental disabilities services 33 office. 1. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 34 any officer or employee of the Hudson Valley developmental disabilities 35 services office represented in the collective negotiating units desig- 36 nated as the administrative services unit, the institutional services 37 unit or the operational services unit, who is receiving location pay 38 pursuant to section 5 of chapter 174 of the laws of 1993 shall continue 39 to receive such location pay under the conditions and at the rates spec- 40 ified by such section. 41 2. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any 42 officer or employee of the Hudson Valley developmental disabilities 43 services office represented in the collective negotiating units desig- 44 nated as the administrative services unit, the institutional services 45 unit or the operational services unit, who is receiving location pay 46 pursuant to subdivision 2 of section 9 of chapter 315 of the laws of 47 1995 shall continue to receive such location pay under the conditions 48 and at the rates specified by such subdivision. 49 3. Notwithstanding section eight of this act or any other law, rule or 50 regulation to the contrary, any officer or employee of the Hudson Valley 51 developmental disabilities services office represented in the collective 52 negotiating units designated as the administrative services unit, the 53 institutional services unit or the operational services unit, who is 54 receiving location pay pursuant to such section eight shall continue to 55 be eligible for such location pay if such officer's or employee's prin- 56 cipal place of employment is changed to a location outside of the county S. 10629 11 1 of Rockland as the result of a reduction or redeployment of staff, 2 provided, however, that such officer or employee is reassigned to or 3 otherwise appointed or promoted to a different position at another work 4 location within the Hudson Valley developmental disabilities services 5 office located outside of the county of Rockland. The rate of such 6 continued location pay shall not exceed the rates such officer or 7 employee is receiving on the date of such reassignment, appointment or 8 promotion. 9 § 10. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 10 certain full-time employees of the office for people with developmental 11 disabilities in the collective negotiating unit designated as the insti- 12 tutional services unit who are required to sleep over at their work site 13 shall continue to receive inconvenience pay pursuant to section 17 of 14 chapter 333 of the laws of 1969 as amended, in accordance with and 15 subject to the conditions established by the terms of a negotiated 16 agreement between the state and an employee organization representing 17 such unit and the resolution of a contract grievance bearing identifica- 18 tion number 98-04-448. 19 § 11. Additional compensation for certain employees in recognition of 20 pre-shift briefing. 1. In recognition of the general requirement for 21 full-time employees of the state in the collective negotiating unit 22 designated as the division of military and naval affairs unit, estab- 23 lished pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, to assemble for 24 briefing prior to the commencement of duties, each such employee shall 25 continue to receive additional compensation at the rate of $60 per 26 biweekly payroll period in accordance with the terms of a collectively 27 negotiated agreement between the state and an employee organization 28 representing such employees pursuant to article 14 of the civil service 29 law. Such additional compensation shall be paid in addition to and shall 30 not be a part of the employee's basic annual salary. Notwithstanding the 31 foregoing provisions of this section, or of any other law, such addi- 32 tional compensation as added by this section shall be in lieu of the 33 continuation of any other additional compensation for such employees 34 paid prior to June 2, 1988, in recognition of pre-shift briefing. 35 2. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, effective April 36 1, 2016, where and to the extent that, an agreement between the state 37 and an employee organization entered into pursuant to article 14 of the 38 civil service law so provides, in recognition of the general requirement 39 that certain full-time employees of the state in the collective negoti- 40 ating unit designated as the institutional services unit, established 41 pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, in the employ of the 42 office of children and family services, assemble for briefing prior to 43 the commencement of duties, each such employee shall continue to receive 44 additional compensation in the amount of $4.80, or one-quarter hour of 45 their overtime rate, whichever is higher, when they are required to and 46 actually assemble for such briefing. Such additional compensation shall 47 be paid in addition to and shall not be a part of the employee's basic 48 annual salary. 49 § 12. Assignment to duty pay. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 50 provisions of law, effective April 1, 2026, where and to the extent 51 that, an agreement between the state and an employee organization 52 entered into pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law so 53 provides, an assignment to duty lump sum shall be paid each year to an 54 employee who is serving in a particular assignment deemed qualified 55 pursuant to such agreement. Such payment shall be in an amount negoti- 56 ated for those employees assigned to qualifying work assignments and who S. 10629 12 1 work such assignments for the minimum periods of time in a year provided 2 in the negotiated agreement. Assignment to duty pay shall not be paid in 3 any year an employee does not meet the minimum period of time in such 4 qualifying assignment required by the agreement or upon cessation of the 5 assignment to duty program on March 30, 2031 unless an extension is 6 negotiated by the parties. Such lump sum shall be considered salary only 7 for final average salary retirement purposes. 8 § 13. Long term seasonal employees. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 9 provisions of law, effective April 1, 2026, where and to the extent 10 that, an agreement between the state and an employee organization 11 entered into pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law so 12 provides, a lump sum shall be paid each year to an employee who is serv- 13 ing in a qualifying long term seasonal position. Such payment shall be 14 in an amount negotiated and pursuant to negotiated qualifying criteria 15 and shall be considered salary only for final average salary retirement 16 purposes. Such benefit shall be available until March 30, 2031. 17 § 14. In recognition of the specific requirements for winter mainte- 18 nance activity for full-time employees of the state department of trans- 19 portation in the collective negotiating unit designated as the opera- 20 tional services unit, established pursuant to article 14 of the civil 21 service law, and to the extent the terms of a negotiated agreement 22 between the state and an employee organization representing such unit 23 entered into pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law so 24 provides, such employees shall receive payments for winter maintenance 25 shifts and call-out responses if otherwise eligible and in accordance 26 with such negotiated agreement. 27 § 15. Subdivision 2 of section 17 of chapter 333 of the laws of 1969 28 amending the civil service law and other laws relating to salary 29 increases for certain state officers and employees, as amended by 30 section 17 of part A of chapter 361 of the laws of 2022, is amended to 31 read as follows: 32 2. Any employee subject to this section who is required to work a tour 33 of duty which includes four or more hours between the hours of six p.m. 34 and six a.m., exclusive of any hours for which [he or she receives] they 35 receive overtime compensation, shall be entitled to inconvenience pay 36 for such tour of duty in an amount equal to the daily rate equivalent of 37 four hundred dollars per year, unless a higher daily rate is authorized 38 under the terms of a collective negotiated agreement between the state 39 and an employee organization pursuant to article 14 of the civil service 40 law, or is authorized by the director of the budget for employees 41 excluded from negotiating rights under article 14 of the civil service 42 law, in which case such daily rate may be up to [five hundred seventy- 43 five] eight hundred twenty-five dollars per year, shall continue effec- 44 tive April 2, [2021] 2026. The provisions of this subdivision shall 45 apply on a prorated basis to officers and employees serving on a 46 seasonal basis in the collective negotiating units designated as the 47 administrative services unit, the institutional services unit, the oper- 48 ational services unit, and the division of military and naval affairs 49 unit, and officers and employees excluded from collective negotiating 50 units established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law. 51 § 16. Facility-Based Hazardous Duty Pay. Notwithstanding any incon- 52 sistent provision of law, where and to the extent that an agreement 53 between the state and an employee organization entered into pursuant to 54 article 14 of the civil service law so provides on behalf of employees 55 in the collective negotiating units designated as the administrative, 56 institutional or operational services negotiating units established S. 10629 13 1 pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, effective April 1, 2 2027, and consistent with the terms of the agreement, there shall be 3 paid the amount of three hundred dollars on an annual basis to eligible 4 full-time annual employees of the office of mental health, the office 5 for people with developmental disabilities, the office of children and 6 family services and the department of corrections and community super- 7 vision in recognition of the hazards of their jobs. This payment is not 8 a part of basic annual salary. Similarly, it is not subject to any sala- 9 ry increases. This payment shall be pro-rated for less than full-time 10 employees consistent with the terms of the agreement. 11 § 17. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, where and to 12 the extent that any agreement between the state and an employee organ- 13 ization entered into pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law so 14 provides on behalf of employees in the collective negotiating units 15 designated as the administrative, institutional, operational services 16 negotiating units or the division of military and naval affairs negoti- 17 ating unit established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, 18 the state shall contribute an amount designated in such agreement and 19 for the period covered by such agreement to the accounts of such employ- 20 ees enrolled for dependent care deductions pursuant to subdivision 7 of 21 section 201-a of the state finance law. Such amounts shall be from funds 22 appropriated in this act and shall not be part of basic annual salary 23 for overtime or retirement purposes. 24 § 18. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appro- 25 priations contained in this act shall be available to the state for the 26 payment and publication of grievance and arbitration settlements and 27 awards pursuant to articles 33 and 34 of the collective negotiating 28 agreement between the state and the employee organization representing 29 the collective negotiating units designated as the administrative 30 services unit, the institutional services unit, the operational services 31 unit or the division of military and naval affairs unit established 32 pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law. 33 § 19. During the period April 2, 2026 through April 1, 2031, there 34 shall be a statewide labor-management committee continued and adminis- 35 tered pursuant to the terms of the agreement negotiated between the 36 state and an employee organization representing employees in the collec- 37 tive negotiating units designated as the administrative services unit, 38 the institutional services unit, the operational services unit or the 39 division of military and naval affairs unit established pursuant to 40 article 14 of the civil service law which shall, after April 2, 2026, 41 have the responsibility of studying and making recommendations concern- 42 ing the major issues of productivity, the quality of work life and 43 implementing the agreements reached. 44 § 20. The salary increases, benefit modifications, and any other 45 modifications to terms and conditions of employment provided for by this 46 act for state employees in the collective negotiating units designated 47 as the administrative services unit, the institutional services unit, 48 the operational services unit or the division of military and naval 49 affairs unit established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law 50 shall not be implemented until the director of employee relations shall 51 have delivered to the director of the budget and the comptroller a 52 letter certifying that there is in effect with respect to such negotiat- 53 ing units collectively negotiated agreements, ratified by the member- 54 ship, which provide for such increases and modifications. 55 § 21. Date of entitlement to salary increase. Notwithstanding the 56 provisions of this act or of any other law, the increase in salary or S. 10629 14 1 compensation of any officer or employee provided by this act shall be 2 added to the salary or compensation of such officer or employee at the 3 beginning of that payroll period the first day of which is nearest to 4 the effective date of such increases as provided in this act, or at the 5 beginning of the earlier of two payroll periods the first days of which 6 are nearest but equally near to the effective dates of such increases as 7 provided in this act, provided, however, that for the purposes of deter- 8 mining the salary of such officer or employee upon reclassification, 9 reallocation, appointment, promotion, transfer, demotion, reinstatement 10 or other change of status, such salary increase shall be deemed to be 11 effective on the date thereof as prescribed in this act, and the payment 12 thereof pursuant to this section on a date prior thereto, instead of on 13 such effective date, shall not operate to confer any additional salary 14 rights or benefits on such officer or employee. Payment of such salary 15 increase may be deferred pursuant to section twenty-two of this act. 16 § 22. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of this act 17 or any other provision of law to the contrary, pending payment pursuant 18 to this act of the basic annual salaries of incumbents of positions 19 subject to this act, such incumbents shall receive, as partial compen- 20 sation for services rendered, the rate of salary and other compensation 21 otherwise payable in their respective positions. An incumbent holding a 22 position subject to this act at any time during the period from April 1, 23 2026, until the time when basic annual salaries and other compensation 24 due are first paid pursuant to this act for such services in excess of 25 the salary and other compensation actually received therefor, shall be 26 entitled to a lump sum payment for the difference between the salary and 27 other compensation to which such incumbent is entitled for such services 28 and the salary and other compensation actually received pursuant to the 29 terms of an agreement between the state and the employee organization 30 representing the employees covered by this act. 31 § 23. The comptroller is authorized to pay any amounts required during 32 the fiscal year commencing April 1, 2026 by the foregoing provisions of 33 this act for any state department or agency from any appropriation or 34 other funds available to such state department or agency for personal 35 service or for other related employee benefits during such fiscal year. 36 To the extent that such appropriations in any fund are insufficient to 37 accomplish the purposes herein set forth, the director of the budget is 38 authorized to allocate to the various departments and agencies, from any 39 appropriations available in any fund, the amounts necessary to pay such 40 amounts. 41 § 24. No officer or employee participating in a special annuity 42 program pursuant to the provisions of article 8-C of the education law 43 shall, by reason of an increase in compensation pursuant to this act, 44 suffer any reduction of the salary adjustment to which they would other- 45 wise be entitled by reason of participation in such program, and such 46 salary adjustment shall be based upon the salary of such officer or 47 employee without regard to the reduction authorized by such article. 48 § 25. Notwithstanding any provision of the state finance law or any 49 other provision of law to the contrary, the sum of $215,100,000 is here- 50 by appropriated in the general fund/state purposes account (10050) in 51 miscellaneous-all state departments and agencies solely for 52 apportionment/transfer by the director of the budget for use by any 53 state department or agency in any fund for the fiscal year beginning 54 April 1, 2026 to supplement appropriations for personal service, other 55 than personal service and fringe benefits, and to carry out the 56 provisions of this act. No money shall be available for expenditure from S. 10629 15 1 this appropriation until a certificate of approval has been issued by 2 the director of the budget and a copy of such certificate or any amend- 3 ment thereto has been filed with the state comptroller, the chair of the 4 senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and means 5 committee. The monies hereby appropriated are available for payment of 6 any liabilities or obligations incurred prior to or during the state 7 fiscal year commencing April 1, 2026 through March 31, 2027. For this 8 purpose, these appropriations shall remain in full force and effect for 9 the payment of liabilities incurred on or before March 31, 2027. 10 § 26. The several amounts as hereinafter set forth, or so much thereof 11 as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated from the fund so designated 12 for use by any state department or agency for the fiscal year beginning 13 April 1, 2026 to supplement appropriations from each respective fund 14 available for personal service, other than personal service and fringe 15 benefits, and to carry out the provisions of this act. The monies hereby 16 appropriated are available for payment of any liabilities or obligations 17 incurred prior to or during the state fiscal year commencing April 1, 18 2026 through March 31, 2027. No money shall be available for expenditure 19 from this appropriation until a certificate of approval has been issued 20 by the director of the budget and a copy of such certificate or any 21 amendment thereto has been filed with the state comptroller, the chair 22 of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and 23 means committee. 24 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 25 SPECIAL PAY BILLS 26 General Fund / State Operations 27 State Purposes Account - 10050 28 Non-personal Service 29 Joint committee on health benefits ................ 74,484 30 Employee training and development ................ 611,457 31 Safety and health maintenance committee ........... 36,354 32 Employment security committee ..................... 29,962 33 Work-Life Services ............................... 144,468 34 Employee Benefit Fund .......................... 3,316,080 35 Discipline ........................................ 21,744 36 Statewide performance rating committee ............. 2,387 37 Employee Assistance Program ....................... 36,257 38 Property damage .................................... 1,790 39 Work related clothing (operational services 40 unit) ........................................... 66,433 41 Tool allowance (operational services unit) ......... 4,259 42 Tool insurance (operational services unit) ......... 1,455 43 Uniform allowance (institutional services unit) ... 26,150 44 Work related clothing (institutional 45 services unit) ................................... 4,865 46 Work related clothing (administrative 47 services unit) ................................... 2,700 48 Contract Administration .......................... 400,000 49 § 27. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 50 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2026. Appro- 51 priations made by this act shall remain in full force and effect for 52 liabilities incurred through March 31, 2027. 53 ------------------------------------------------------------------------ S. 10629 16 REPEAL NOTE.--Subparagraphs 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 of paragraph a of subdi- vision 1 of section 130 of the civil service law, repealed by section one of this act, provided salary schedules for state employees in the administrative services unit, the operational services unit, the insti- tutional services unit and the division of military and naval affairs and are replaced by revised salary schedules in new subparagraphs 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5. 1 PART B 2 SALARIES AND BENEFITS FOR CERTAIN STATE 3 OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES EXCLUDED FROM 4 COLLECTIVE NEGOTIATING UNITS FOR 2026-2031 5 Section 1. Subparagraphs 1, 2 and 3 of paragraph d of subdivision 1 of 6 section 130 of the civil service law are REPEALED and five new subpara- 7 graphs 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 are added to read as follows: 8 (1) Effective April first, two thousand twenty-six: 9 GRADE HIRING RATE JOB RATE 10 M/C 3 $32,978 $42,162 11 M/C 4 $34,436 $44,074 12 M/C 5 $36,501 $46,214 13 M/C 6 $38,051 $48,583 14 M/C 7 $40,243 $51,212 15 M/C 8 $42,453 $53,852 16 M/C 9 $44,879 $56,718 17 M/C 10 $47,297 $59,867 18 M/C 11 $50,166 $63,188 19 M/C 12 $52,814 $66,504 20 M/C 13 $55,885 $70,199 21 M/C 14 $59,204 $74,058 22 M/C 15 $62,499 $78,056 23 M/C 16 $66,023 $82,221 24 M/C 17 $69,770 $86,757 25 M/C 18 $70,139 $87,034 26 M/C 19 $73,902 $91,561 27 M/C 20 $77,670 $96,153 28 M/C 21 $81,858 $101,118 29 M/C 22 $86,256 $106,431 30 M/C 23 $90,678 $113,292 31 M 1 $97,874 $123,715 32 M 2 $108,544 $137,206 33 M 3 $120,471 $152,238 34 M 4 $133,245 $168,152 35 M 5 $147,952 $186,923 36 M 6 $163,811 $206,043 37 M 7 $180,562 $223,625 38 M 8 $152,241 + 39 (2) Effective April first, two thousand twenty-seven: 40 GRADE HIRING RATE JOB RATE 41 M/C 3 $34,297 $43,848 42 M/C 4 $35,813 $45,837 43 M/C 5 $37,961 $48,063 S. 10629 17 1 M/C 6 $39,573 $50,526 2 M/C 7 $41,853 $53,260 3 M/C 8 $44,151 $56,006 4 M/C 9 $46,674 $58,987 5 M/C 10 $49,189 $62,262 6 M/C 11 $52,173 $65,716 7 M/C 12 $54,927 $69,164 8 M/C 13 $58,120 $73,007 9 M/C 14 $61,572 $77,020 10 M/C 15 $64,999 $81,178 11 M/C 16 $68,664 $85,510 12 M/C 17 $72,561 $90,227 13 M/C 18 $72,945 $90,515 14 M/C 19 $76,858 $95,223 15 M/C 20 $80,777 $99,999 16 M/C 21 $85,132 $105,163 17 M/C 22 $89,706 $110,688 18 M/C 23 $94,305 $117,824 19 M 1 $101,789 $128,664 20 M 2 $112,886 $142,694 21 M 3 $125,290 $158,328 22 M 4 $138,575 $174,878 23 M 5 $153,870 $194,400 24 M 6 $170,363 $214,285 25 M 7 $187,784 $232,570 26 M 8 $158,331 + 27 (3) Effective April first, two thousand twenty-eight: 28 GRADE HIRING RATE JOB RATE 29 M/C 3 $35,497 $45,383 30 M/C 4 $37,066 $47,441 31 M/C 5 $39,290 $49,745 32 M/C 6 $40,958 $52,294 33 M/C 7 $43,318 $55,124 34 M/C 8 $45,696 $57,966 35 M/C 9 $48,308 $61,052 36 M/C 10 $50,911 $64,441 37 M/C 11 $53,999 $68,016 38 M/C 12 $56,849 $71,585 39 M/C 13 $60,154 $75,562 40 M/C 14 $63,727 $79,716 41 M/C 15 $67,274 $84,019 42 M/C 16 $71,067 $88,503 43 M/C 17 $75,101 $93,385 44 M/C 18 $75,498 $93,683 45 M/C 19 $79,548 $98,556 46 M/C 20 $83,604 $103,499 47 M/C 21 $88,112 $108,844 48 M/C 22 $92,846 $114,562 49 M/C 23 $97,606 $121,948 50 M 1 $105,352 $133,167 51 M 2 $116,837 $147,688 52 M 3 $129,675 $163,869 53 M 4 $143,425 $180,999 54 M 5 $159,255 $201,204 S. 10629 18 1 M 6 $176,326 $221,785 2 M 7 $194,356 $240,710 3 M 8 $163,873 + 4 (4) Effective April first, two thousand twenty-nine: 5 GRADE HIRING RATE JOB RATE 6 M/C 3 $36,562 $46,744 7 M/C 4 $38,178 $48,864 8 M/C 5 $40,469 $51,237 9 M/C 6 $42,187 $53,863 10 M/C 7 $44,618 $56,778 11 M/C 8 $47,067 $59,705 12 M/C 9 $49,757 $62,884 13 M/C 10 $52,438 $66,374 14 M/C 11 $55,619 $70,056 15 M/C 12 $58,554 $73,733 16 M/C 13 $61,959 $77,829 17 M/C 14 $65,639 $82,107 18 M/C 15 $69,292 $86,540 19 M/C 16 $73,199 $91,158 20 M/C 17 $77,354 $96,187 21 M/C 18 $77,763 $96,493 22 M/C 19 $81,934 $101,513 23 M/C 20 $86,112 $106,604 24 M/C 21 $90,755 $112,109 25 M/C 22 $95,631 $117,999 26 M/C 23 $100,534 $125,606 27 M 1 $108,513 $137,162 28 M 2 $120,342 $152,119 29 M 3 $133,565 $168,785 30 M 4 $147,728 $186,429 31 M 5 $164,033 $207,240 32 M 6 $181,616 $228,439 33 M 7 $200,187 $247,931 34 M 8 $168,789 + 35 (5) Effective April first, two thousand thirty: 36 GRADE HIRING RATE JOB RATE 37 M/C 3 $37,659 $48,146 38 M/C 4 $39,323 $50,330 39 M/C 5 $41,683 $52,774 40 M/C 6 $43,453 $55,479 41 M/C 7 $45,957 $58,481 42 M/C 8 $48,479 $61,496 43 M/C 9 $51,250 $64,771 44 M/C 10 $54,011 $68,365 45 M/C 11 $57,288 $72,158 46 M/C 12 $60,311 $75,945 47 M/C 13 $63,818 $80,164 48 M/C 14 $67,608 $84,570 49 M/C 15 $71,371 $89,136 50 M/C 16 $75,395 $93,893 51 M/C 17 $79,675 $99,073 52 M/C 18 $80,096 $99,388 S. 10629 19 1 M/C 19 $84,392 $104,558 2 M/C 20 $88,695 $109,802 3 M/C 21 $93,478 $115,472 4 M/C 22 $98,500 $121,539 5 M/C 23 $103,550 $129,374 6 M 1 $111,768 $141,277 7 M 2 $123,952 $156,683 8 M 3 $137,572 $173,849 9 M 4 $152,160 $192,022 10 M 5 $168,954 $213,457 11 M 6 $187,064 $235,292 12 M 7 $206,193 $255,369 13 M 8 $173,853 + 14 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 19 of the correction law is REPEALED and 15 a new subdivision 1 is added to read as follows: 16 1. This section shall apply to each superintendent of a correctional 17 facility appointed on or after August ninth, nineteen hundred seventy- 18 five and any superintendent heretofore appointed who elects to be 19 covered by the provisions thereof by filing such election with the 20 commissioner. 21 a. The salary schedule for superintendents of a correctional facility 22 with an incarcerated individual population capacity of four hundred or 23 more incarcerated individuals shall be as follows: 24 Effective April first, two thousand twenty-six: 25 Hiring Rate Job Rate 26 $154,918 $211,411 27 Effective April first, two thousand twenty-seven: 28 Hiring Rate Job Rate 29 $161,115 $219,867 30 Effective April first, two thousand twenty-eight: 31 Hiring Rate Job Rate 32 $166,754 $227,562 33 Effective April first, two thousand twenty-nine: 34 Hiring Rate Job Rate 35 $171,757 $234,389 36 Effective April first, two thousand thirty: 37 Hiring Rate Job Rate 38 $176,910 $241,421 39 b. The salary schedule for superintendents of correctional facilities 40 with an incarcerated individual population capacity of fewer than four 41 hundred incarcerated individuals shall be as follows: 42 Effective April first, two thousand twenty-six: 43 Hiring Rate Job Rate 44 $120,471 $152,240 45 Effective April first, two thousand twenty-seven: 46 Hiring Rate Job Rate 47 $125,290 $158,330 48 Effective April first, two thousand twenty-eight: 49 Hiring Rate Job Rate 50 $129,675 $163,872 51 Effective April first, two thousand twenty-nine: 52 Hiring Rate Job Rate 53 $133,565 $168,788 54 Effective April first, two thousand thirty: S. 10629 20 1 Hiring Rate Job Rate 2 $137,572 $173,852 3 § 3. Compensation for certain state officers and employees. 1. The 4 provisions of this section shall apply to the following annual-salaried 5 state officers and employees: (a) officers and employees whose positions 6 are designated managerial or confidential pursuant to article 14 of the 7 civil service law; (b) civilian state employees of the division of mili- 8 tary and naval affairs in the executive department whose positions are 9 not in, or are excluded from representation rights in, any recognized or 10 certified negotiating unit; (c) officers and employees excluded from 11 representation rights under article 14 of the civil service law pursuant 12 to rules or regulations of the public employment relations board; and 13 (d) officers and employees whose salaries are prescribed by section 19 14 of the correction law. 15 2. For such officers and employees the following increases shall 16 apply: effective April 1, 2026, the basic annual salary of officers and 17 employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply shall be 18 increased by four and one-half percent adjusted to the nearest whole 19 dollar amount; effective April 1, 2027, the basic annual salary of offi- 20 cers and employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply 21 shall be increased by four percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar 22 amount; effective April 1, 2028, the basic annual salary of officers and 23 employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply shall be 24 increased by three and one-half percent adjusted to the nearest whole 25 dollar amount; effective April 1, 2029, the basic annual salary of offi- 26 cers and employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply 27 shall be increased by three percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar 28 amount; and effective April 1, 2030, the basic annual salary of officers 29 and employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply shall be 30 increased by three percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar amount. 31 3. If an unencumbered position is one that, if encumbered, would be 32 subject to the provisions of this section, the salary of such position 33 shall be increased by the salary increase amount specified in this 34 section. If a position is created and is filled by the appointment of an 35 officer or employee who is subject to the provisions of this section, 36 the salary otherwise provided for such position shall be increased in 37 the same manner as though such position had been in existence but unen- 38 cumbered. 39 4. The increase in salary payable pursuant to this section shall apply 40 on a prorated basis in accordance with guidelines issued by the director 41 of the budget to officers and employees otherwise eligible to receive an 42 increase in salary pursuant to this act who are paid on an hourly or per 43 diem basis, employees serving on a part-time or seasonal basis, and 44 employees paid on any basis other than at an annual salary rate. 45 5. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, 46 the provisions of this section shall not apply to the following except 47 as otherwise provided by law: (a) officers or employees paid on a fee 48 schedule basis; (b) officers or employees whose salaries are prescribed 49 by section 40, 60 or 169 of the executive law; (c) officers or employees 50 in collective negotiating units established pursuant to article 14 of 51 the civil service law. 52 6. Officers and employees to whom the provisions of this section apply 53 who are incumbents of positions that are not allocated to salary grades 54 specified in paragraph d of subdivision 1 of section 130 of the civil 55 service law and whose salary is not prescribed in any other statute S. 10629 21 1 shall receive the salary increases specified in subdivision two of this 2 section. 3 7. In order to provide for the officers and employees to whom this 4 section applies who are not allocated to salary grades performance 5 advancements, merit awards, longevity payments and in lieu payments, and 6 special achievement awards in proportion to those provided to persons to 7 whom this section applies who are allocated to salary grades, the direc- 8 tor of the budget is authorized to add appropriate adjustments to the 9 compensation that such officers and employees are otherwise entitled to 10 receive. The director of the budget shall issue certificates that shall 11 contain schedules of positions and the salaries or payments thereof for 12 which adjustments or payments are made pursuant to the provisions of 13 this subdivision, and a copy of each such certificate shall be filed 14 with the state comptroller, the department of civil service, the chair 15 of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and 16 means committee. 17 8. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, 18 any increase in compensation for any officer or employee appointed to a 19 lower graded position from a redeployment list pursuant to subdivision 1 20 of section 79 of the civil service law who continues to receive their 21 former salary pursuant to such subdivision shall be determined on the 22 basis of such lower graded position provided, however, that the 23 increases in salary provided in subdivision two of this section shall 24 not cause such officer's or employee's salary to exceed the job rate of 25 any such lower graded position at salary grade. 26 9. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section or 27 of any law to the contrary, the director of the budget may reduce the 28 salary of any position which is vacant or which becomes vacant, so long 29 as the position, if encumbered, would be subject to the provisions of 30 this section. The director of the budget does not need to provide a 31 reason for such reduction. 32 § 4. Compensation for certain state officers and employees in the 33 division of state police. 1. The provisions of this section shall apply 34 to officers and employees whose salaries are provided for by paragraph 35 (a) of subdivision 1 of section 215 of the executive law. 36 2. Effective April 1, 2026, the basic annual salary of officers and 37 employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply shall be 38 increased by four and one-half percent adjusted to the nearest whole 39 dollar amount; effective April 1, 2027, the basic annual salary of offi- 40 cers and employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply 41 shall be increased by four percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar 42 amount; effective April 1, 2028, the basic annual salary of officers and 43 employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply shall be 44 increased by three and one-half percent adjusted to the nearest whole 45 dollar amount; effective April 1, 2029, the basic annual salary of offi- 46 cers and employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply 47 shall be increased by three percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar 48 amount; and effective April 1, 2030, the basic annual salary of officers 49 and employees to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply shall be 50 increased by three percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar amount. 51 3. The increases in salary payable pursuant to this section shall 52 apply on a prorated basis in accordance with guidelines issued by the 53 director of the budget to officers and employees otherwise eligible to 54 receive an increase in salary pursuant to this act who are paid on an 55 hourly or per diem basis, employees serving on a part-time or seasonal S. 10629 22 1 basis, and employees paid on any basis other than at an annual salary 2 rate. 3 4. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, 4 any increase in compensation for any officer or employee appointed to a 5 lower graded position from a redeployment list pursuant to subdivision 1 6 of section 79 of the civil service law who continues to receive their 7 former salary pursuant to such subdivision shall be determined on the 8 basis of such lower graded position provided, however, that the increase 9 in salary provided in subdivision two of this section shall not cause 10 such officer's or employee's salary to exceed the job rate of any such 11 lower graded position at salary grade. 12 § 5. Compensation for certain state employees in the state university 13 and certain employees of contract colleges at Cornell and Alfred univer- 14 sities. 1. (a) Effective April 1, 2026, the basic annual salary of 15 incumbents of positions in the professional service in the state univer- 16 sity that are designated, stipulated, or excluded from negotiating units 17 as managerial or confidential as defined pursuant to article 14 of the 18 civil service law, may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the 19 state university trustees. Such increase in basic annual salary rates 20 shall not exceed in the aggregate four and one-half percent of the total 21 basic annual salary rates in effect on March 31, 2026. 22 (b) Effective April 1, 2027, the basic annual salary of incumbents of 23 positions in the professional service in the state university that are 24 designated, stipulated, or excluded from negotiating units as managerial 25 or confidential as defined pursuant to article 14 of the civil service 26 law, may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state university 27 trustees. Such increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in 28 the aggregate four percent of the total basic annual salary rates in 29 effect on March 31, 2027. 30 (c) Effective April 1, 2028, the basic annual salary of incumbents of 31 positions in the professional service in the state university that are 32 designated, stipulated, or excluded from negotiating units as managerial 33 or confidential as defined pursuant to article 14 of the civil service 34 law, may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state university 35 trustees. Such increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in 36 the aggregate three and one-half percent of the total basic annual sala- 37 ry rates in effect on March 31, 2028. 38 (d) Effective April 1, 2029, the basic annual salary of incumbents of 39 positions in the professional service in the state university that are 40 designated, stipulated, or excluded from negotiating units as managerial 41 or confidential as defined pursuant to article 14 of the civil service 42 law, may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state university 43 trustees. Such increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in 44 the aggregate three percent of the total basic annual salary rates in 45 effect on March 31, 2029. 46 (e) Effective April 1, 2030, the basic annual salary of incumbents of 47 positions in the professional service in the state university that are 48 designated, stipulated, or excluded from negotiating units as managerial 49 or confidential as defined pursuant to article 14 of the civil service 50 law, may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state university 51 trustees. Such increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in 52 the aggregate three percent of the total basic annual salary rates in 53 effect on March 31, 2030. 54 2. (a) Effective April 1, 2026, the basic annual salary of incumbents 55 of positions in the institutions under the management and control of 56 Cornell and Alfred universities as representatives of the board of trus- S. 10629 23 1 tees of the state university that, in the opinion of the director of 2 employee relations, would be designated managerial or confidential were 3 they subject to article 14 of the civil service law may be increased 4 pursuant to plans approved by the state university trustees. Such 5 increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in the aggregate 6 four and one-half percent of the total basic annual salary rates in 7 effect March 31, 2026. 8 (b) Effective April 1, 2027, the basic annual salary of incumbents of 9 positions in the institutions under the management and control of 10 Cornell and Alfred universities as representatives of the board of trus- 11 tees of the state university that, in the opinion of the director of 12 employee relations, would be designated managerial or confidential were 13 they subject to article 14 of the civil service law may be increased 14 pursuant to plans approved by the state university trustees. Such 15 increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in the aggregate 16 four percent of the total basic annual salary rates in effect March 31, 17 2027. 18 (c) Effective April 1, 2028, the basic annual salary of incumbents of 19 positions in the institutions under the management and control of 20 Cornell and Alfred universities as representatives of the board of trus- 21 tees of the state university that, in the opinion of the director of 22 employee relations, would be designated managerial or confidential were 23 they subject to article 14 of the civil service law may be increased 24 pursuant to plans approved by the state university trustees. Such 25 increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in the aggregate 26 three and one-half percent of the total basic annual salary rates in 27 effect March 31, 2028. 28 (d) Effective April 1, 2029, the basic annual salary of incumbents of 29 positions in the institutions under the management and control of 30 Cornell and Alfred universities as representatives of the board of trus- 31 tees of the state university that, in the opinion of the director of 32 employee relations, would be designated managerial or confidential were 33 they subject to article 14 of the civil service law may be increased 34 pursuant to plans approved by the state university trustees. Such 35 increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in the aggregate 36 three percent of the total basic annual salary rates in effect March 31, 37 2029. 38 (e) Effective April 1, 2030, the basic annual salary of incumbents of 39 positions in the institutions under the management and control of 40 Cornell and Alfred universities as representatives of the board of trus- 41 tees of the state university that, in the opinion of the director of 42 employee relations, would be designated managerial or confidential were 43 they subject to article 14 of the civil service law may be increased 44 pursuant to plans approved by the state university trustees. Such 45 increase in basic annual salary rates shall not exceed in the aggregate 46 three percent of the total basic annual salary rates in effect March 31, 47 2030. 48 3. (a) During the period April 1, 2026 through March 31, 2027, the 49 basic annual salary of incumbents of positions in the non-professional 50 service that, in the opinion of the director of employee relations, 51 would be designated managerial or confidential were they subject to 52 article 14 of the civil service law, except those positions in the 53 Cornell service and maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of a 54 collective bargaining agreement between Cornell University and the 55 employee organization representing employees in such positions and 56 except those positions in the Alfred service and maintenance unit that S. 10629 24 1 are subject to the terms of a collective bargaining agreement between 2 Alfred University and the employee organization representing employees 3 in such positions, in institutions under the management and control of 4 Cornell and Alfred universities as representatives of the board of trus- 5 tees of the state university may be increased pursuant to plans approved 6 by the state university trustees. Such plans may include a new salary 7 schedule which shall supersede the salary schedules then in effect 8 applicable to such employees. Such plans shall provide for an increase 9 in basic annual salary, which, exclusive of performance advancement 10 payments or merit recognition payments, shall not exceed in the aggre- 11 gate four and one-half percent of the total basic annual salary rates in 12 effect on March 31, 2026. 13 (b) During the period April 1, 2027 through March 31, 2028, the basic 14 annual salary of incumbents of positions in the non-professional service 15 that, in the opinion of the director of employee relations, would be 16 designated managerial or confidential were they subject to article 14 of 17 the civil service law, except those positions in the Cornell service and 18 maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of a collective bargain- 19 ing agreement between Cornell University and the employee organization 20 representing employees in such positions and except those positions in 21 the Alfred service and maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of 22 a collective bargaining agreement between Alfred University and the 23 employee organization representing employees in such positions, in 24 institutions under the management and control of Cornell and Alfred 25 universities as representatives of the board of trustees of the state 26 university may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state 27 university trustees. Such plans may include a new salary schedule which 28 shall supersede the salary schedules then in effect applicable to such 29 employees. Such plans shall provide for an increase in basic annual 30 salary, which, exclusive of performance advancement payments or merit 31 recognition payments, shall not exceed in the aggregate four percent of 32 the total basic annual salary rates in effect on March 31, 2027. 33 (c) During the period April 1, 2028 through March 31, 2029, the basic 34 annual salary of incumbents of positions in the non-professional service 35 that, in the opinion of the director of employee relations, would be 36 designated managerial or confidential were they subject to article 14 of 37 the civil service law, except those positions in the Cornell service and 38 maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of a collective bargain- 39 ing agreement between Cornell University and the employee organization 40 representing employees in such positions and except those positions in 41 the Alfred service and maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of 42 a collective bargaining agreement between Alfred University and the 43 employee organization representing employees in such positions, in 44 institutions under the management and control of Cornell and Alfred 45 universities as representatives of the board of trustees of the state 46 university may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state 47 university trustees. Such plans may include a new salary schedule which 48 shall supersede the salary schedules then in effect applicable to such 49 employees. Such plans shall provide for an increase in basic annual 50 salary, which, exclusive of performance advancement payments or merit 51 recognition payments, shall not exceed in the aggregate three and one- 52 half percent of the total basic annual salary rates in effect on March 53 31, 2028. 54 (d) During the period April 1, 2029 through March 31, 2030, the basic 55 annual salary of incumbents of positions in the non-professional service 56 that, in the opinion of the director of employee relations, would be S. 10629 25 1 designated managerial or confidential were they subject to article 14 of 2 the civil service law, except those positions in the Cornell service and 3 maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of a collective bargain- 4 ing agreement between Cornell University and the employee organization 5 representing employees in such positions and except those positions in 6 the Alfred service and maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of 7 a collective bargaining agreement between Alfred University and the 8 employee organization representing employees in such positions, in 9 institutions under the management and control of Cornell and Alfred 10 universities as representatives of the board of trustees of the state 11 university may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state 12 university trustees. Such plans may include a new salary schedule which 13 shall supersede the salary schedules then in effect applicable to such 14 employees. Such plans shall provide for an increase in basic annual 15 salary, which, exclusive of performance advancement payments or merit 16 recognition payments, shall not exceed in the aggregate three percent of 17 the total basic annual salary rates in effect on March 31, 2029. 18 (e) During the period April 1, 2030 through March 31, 2031, the basic 19 annual salary of incumbents of positions in the non-professional service 20 that, in the opinion of the director of employee relations, would be 21 designated managerial or confidential were they subject to article 14 of 22 the civil service law, except those positions in the Cornell service and 23 maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of a collective bargain- 24 ing agreement between Cornell University and the employee organization 25 representing employees in such positions and except those positions in 26 the Alfred service and maintenance unit that are subject to the terms of 27 a collective bargaining agreement between Alfred University and the 28 employee organization representing employees in such positions, in 29 institutions under the management and control of Cornell and Alfred 30 universities as representatives of the board of trustees of the state 31 university may be increased pursuant to plans approved by the state 32 university trustees. Such plans may include a new salary schedule which 33 shall supersede the salary schedules then in effect applicable to such 34 employees. Such plans shall provide for an increase in basic annual 35 salary, which, exclusive of performance advancement payments or merit 36 recognition payments, shall not exceed in the aggregate three percent of 37 the total basic annual salary rates in effect on March 31, 2030. 38 4. For the purposes of this section, the basic annual salary of an 39 employee is that salary that is obtained through direct appropriation of 40 state moneys for the purpose of paying wages. Nothing in this part shall 41 prevent increasing amounts paid to incumbents of such positions in the 42 professional service in addition to the basic annual salary, provided, 43 however, that the amounts required for such increase and the cost of 44 fringe benefits attributable to such increase, as determined by the 45 comptroller, are made available to the state in accordance with the 46 procedures established by the state university, with the approval of the 47 director of the budget, for such purposes. 48 5. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section or 49 any law to the contrary, any increase in compensation may be withheld in 50 whole or in part from any employee to whom the provisions of this 51 section apply pursuant to section fourteen of this act. 52 § 6. Compensation for certain state employees in the state university 53 that are designated, stipulated, or excluded from negotiating units as 54 managerial or confidential pursuant to article 14 of the civil service 55 law and certain employees of contract colleges at Cornell and Alfred 56 universities. S. 10629 26 1 1. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply only to incumbents 2 of positions in bargaining unit 13 in the professional service of the 3 state university that are designated, stipulated or excluded from nego- 4 tiating units as managerial or confidential pursuant to article 14 of 5 the civil service law. For each of the years 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030 and 6 2031, there shall be available an amount equal to one percent (1.0%) of 7 the total of the basic annual salaries on June 30 of each such year of 8 incumbents to whom the provisions of this subdivision apply, for 9 distribution to such incumbents on the payroll on June 30 of each such 10 year and at the time of payment by the state university trustees in 11 their discretion, and subject to the approval of the chancellor and the 12 director of the budget. 13 2. The compensation increases in subdivision one of this section may 14 also be provided by Cornell and Alfred universities, within available 15 appropriations, at their discretion, and with the requisite approval of 16 the state university trustees and the director of the budget, to incum- 17 bents of positions in the institutions under the management of Cornell 18 and Alfred universities as representative of the board of trustees of 19 the state university of New York that, in the opinion of the director of 20 employee relations, would be designated managerial or confidential were 21 they subject to article 14 of the civil service law. 22 § 7. Location compensation for certain state officers and employees. 23 1. This section shall apply to all full-time annual salaried state 24 officers and employees and non-annual salaried seasonal state officers 25 and employees except the following: 26 (a) officers and employees of the legislature and the judiciary, 27 including officers and employees of boards, bodies and commissions that 28 are deemed to be part of the legislature or judiciary for the purposes 29 of section 49 of the state finance law; 30 (b) officers and employees whose salaries are prescribed by or deter- 31 mined in accordance with section 40, 60, 169, 215 or 216 of the execu- 32 tive law; 33 (c) incumbents of allocated or unallocated positions in the profes- 34 sional service in the state university and in institutions under the 35 management and control of Cornell and Alfred universities as represen- 36 tatives of the board of trustees of the state university; 37 (d) officers and employees who are in recognized or certified collec- 38 tive negotiating units pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law. 39 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 15 of chapter 333 of the 40 laws of 1969, as amended, officers and employees subject to this section 41 whose principal place of employment or, in the case of field employees, 42 whose official station as determined in accordance with the regulations 43 of the comptroller is located: 44 (a) in the county of Monroe and who were eligible to receive location 45 pay on March 31, 1985, shall receive location pay at the rate of $200 46 per year provided they continue to be otherwise eligible; 47 (b) in the city of New York, or in the county of Rockland, Westches- 48 ter, Nassau, or Suffolk shall continue to receive a downstate adjustment 49 at the rate of $4,000 effective April 1, 2025. Such amount shall 50 increase as follows: to $4,150 effective April 1, 2026; to $4,316 effec- 51 tive April 1, 2027; to $4,467 effective April 1, 2028; to $4,601 effec- 52 tive April 1, 2029; and to $4,739 effective April 1, 2030; and 53 (c) in the county of Dutchess, Orange, or Putnam shall continue to 54 receive a mid-Hudson adjustment at the rate of $2,000 effective April 1, 55 2025. The county of Ulster shall be added effective April 1, 2026 and 56 such amount shall be increased as follows: to $2,150 effective April 1, S. 10629 27 1 2026; to $2,236 effective April 1, 2027; to $2,314 effective April 1, 2 2028; to $2,383 effective April 1, 2029; and to $2,454 effective April 3 1, 2030. 4 3. Such location payments shall be in addition to and shall not be a 5 part of an employee's basic annual salary and shall not affect or impair 6 any advancements or other rights or benefits to which an employee may be 7 entitled by law, provided, however, that location payments shall be 8 included as compensation for purposes of computation of overtime pay and 9 for retirement purposes. 10 4. For the sole purpose of continuing eligibility for location pay in 11 Monroe County, an employee previously eligible to receive location pay 12 on March 31, 1985 who is on an approved leave of absence or participates 13 in an employer program to reduce to part-time service during summer 14 months shall continue to be eligible for said location pay upon return 15 to full-time state service in Monroe county. 16 § 8. Continuation of location compensation for certain officers and 17 employees of the Hudson Valley developmental disabilities services 18 office. 1. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 19 any officer or employee of the Hudson Valley developmental disabilities 20 services office not represented in collective negotiating units estab- 21 lished pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law who is receiving 22 location pay pursuant to section 5 of chapter 174 of the laws of 1993 23 shall continue to receive such location pay under the conditions and at 24 the rates specified by such section. 25 2. Notwithstanding section seven of this act or any other provision of 26 law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any officer or employee of the 27 Hudson Valley developmental disabilities services office not represented 28 in collective negotiating units established pursuant to article 14 of 29 the civil service law who is receiving location pay pursuant to section 30 seven of this act shall continue to be eligible for such location pay if 31 such officer's or employee's principal place of employment is changed to 32 a location outside of the county of Rockland as the result of a 33 reduction or redeployment of staff, provided, however, that such officer 34 or employee is reassigned to or otherwise appointed or promoted to a 35 different position at another work location within such Hudson Valley 36 developmental disabilities services office located outside of the county 37 of Rockland. The rate of such continued location pay shall not exceed 38 the rate such officer or employee is receiving on the date of such reas- 39 signment, appointment, or promotion. 40 § 9. Overtime meal allowance. Notwithstanding any other provision of 41 law to the contrary, individuals in positions in the classified service 42 of the state of New York designated managerial or confidential pursuant 43 to article 14 of the civil service law, shall continue to receive, 44 effective April 1, 2011, an overtime meal allowance in the amount of 45 $5.50 pursuant to eligibility guidelines developed by the director of 46 employee relations. 47 § 10. Effect of participation in special annuity program. No officer 48 or employee participating in a special annuity program pursuant to the 49 provisions of article 8-C of the education law shall, by reason of an 50 increase in compensation pursuant to this act, suffer any reduction of 51 the salary adjustment to which that employee would otherwise be entitled 52 by reason of participation in such program, and such salary adjustment 53 shall be based upon the salary of such officer or employee without 54 regard to the reduction authorized by such article. 55 § 11. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appro- 56 priations contained in this act shall be available to the state for the S. 10629 28 1 payment of grievance settlements and awards pursuant to executive order 2 42, dated October 14, 1970, and title 9, part 560, official compilation 3 of codes, rules and regulations of the state of New York. 4 § 12. Date of entitlement to salary increase. Notwithstanding the 5 provisions of this act or of any other law, the increase in salary or 6 compensation of any officer or employee provided by this act shall be 7 added to the salary or compensation of such officer or employee at the 8 beginning of that payroll period the first day of which is nearest to 9 the effective date of such increases as provided in this act, or at the 10 beginning of the earlier of two payroll periods the first days of which 11 are nearest but equally near to the effective dates of such increases as 12 provided in this act, provided, however, that for the purposes of deter- 13 mining the salary of such officer or employee upon reclassification, 14 reallocation, appointment, promotion, transfer, demotion, reinstatement 15 or other change of status, such salary increase shall be deemed to be 16 effective on the date thereof as prescribed in this act, and the payment 17 thereof pursuant to this section on a date prior thereto, instead of on 18 such effective date, shall not operate to confer any additional salary 19 rights or benefits on such officer or employee. Payment of such salary 20 increase may be deferred pursuant to section thirteen of this act. 21 § 13. Deferred payment of salary increase. Notwithstanding the 22 provisions of any other section of this act or any other provision of 23 law to the contrary, pending payment pursuant to this act of the basic 24 annual salaries of incumbents of positions subject to this act, such 25 incumbents shall receive, as partial compensation for services rendered, 26 the rate of salary and other compensation otherwise payable in their 27 respective positions. An incumbent holding a position subject to this 28 act at any time during the period from April 1, 2026, until the time 29 when basic annual salaries and other compensation due are first paid 30 pursuant to this act for such services in excess of the salary and other 31 compensation actually received therefor, shall be entitled to a lump sum 32 payment for the difference between the salary and other compensation to 33 which such incumbent is entitled for such services and the salary and 34 other compensation actually received. 35 § 14. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of this 36 act or any other provision of law to the contrary, any increase in 37 compensation provided: (a) in this act, or (b) as a result of a 38 promotion, appointment, or advancement to a position in a higher salary 39 grade, or (c) pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision 6 of section 131 40 of the civil service law, or (d) pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivi- 41 sion 8 of section 130 of the civil service law, or (e) pursuant to para- 42 graph (a) of subdivision 3 of section 13 of chapter 732 of the laws of 43 1988, as amended, may be withheld in whole or in part from any officer 44 or employee when, in the opinion of the director of the budget, such 45 withholding is necessary to reflect the job performance of such officer 46 or employee, or to maintain appropriate salary relationships among offi- 47 cers or employees of the state, or to reduce state expenditures to 48 acceptable levels or when, in the opinion of the director of the budget, 49 such increase is not warranted or is not appropriate. As a result of an 50 exercise of the director's authority under this act to withhold any 51 increase, such salary schedules as defined in section one of this act 52 shall be implemented and/or modified by the director of the budget, as 53 necessary, consistent with the provision or withholding of such 54 increases pursuant to this section. 55 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of this act, 56 the salary increase provided for in this act shall not be implemented S. 10629 29 1 until the director of the budget delivers notice to the comptroller that 2 such amounts may be paid. 3 § 15. Use of appropriations. Notwithstanding any provision of the 4 state finance law or any other provision of law to the contrary, the 5 state comptroller is authorized to pay any amounts required during the 6 fiscal year commencing April 1, 2026 by the provisions of this act for 7 any state department or agency from any appropriation or other funds 8 available to such state department or agency for personal service or for 9 other related employee benefits during such fiscal year. To the extent 10 that such appropriations are insufficient in any fund to accomplish the 11 purposes herein set forth, the director of the budget is authorized to 12 allocate to the various departments and agencies, from any appropriate 13 available in any fund, the amounts necessary to pay such amounts. The 14 aforementioned appropriations shall be available for payment of any 15 liabilities or obligations incurred prior to April 1, 2026 in addition 16 to current liabilities. 17 § 16. Notwithstanding any provision of the state finance law or any 18 other provision of law to the contrary, the sum of $112,000,000 is here- 19 by appropriated in the general fund/state purposes account (10050) in 20 miscellaneous-all state departments and agencies solely for 21 apportionment/transfer by the director of the budget for use by any 22 state department or agency in any fund for the state fiscal year April 23 1, 2026 through March 31, 2027 to supplement appropriations for personal 24 service, other than personal service and fringe benefits, and to carry 25 out the provisions of this act. No money shall be available for expendi- 26 ture from this appropriation until a certificate of approval has been 27 issued by the director of the budget and a copy of such certificate or 28 any amendment thereto has been filed with the state comptroller, the 29 chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways 30 and means committee. The monies hereby appropriated are available for 31 payment of any liabilities or obligations incurred prior to or during 32 the state fiscal year April 1, 2026 through March 31, 2027. For this 33 purpose, the monies appropriated shall remain in full force and effect 34 for the payment of liabilities incurred on or before March 31, 2027. 35 § 17. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 36 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2026. Appro- 37 priations made by this act shall remain in full force and effect for 38 liabilities incurred through March 31, 2027. 39 ----------------------------------------------------------------- REPEAL NOTE.--Subparagraphs 1, 2 and 3 of paragraph d of subdivision 1 of section 130 of the civil service law, repealed by section one of this act, provided salary schedules for unrepresented state employees and are replaced by revised salary schedules in new subparagraphs 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5. Subdivision 1 of section 19 of the correction law, repealed by section two of this act, provided salary schedules for superintendents of correctional facilities and are replaced by revised salary schedules in new subdivision 1. 40 § 2. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 41 sion, section or part contained in any part of this act shall be 42 adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such 43 judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, 44 but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, para- 45 graph, subdivision, section or part contained in any part thereof 46 directly involved in the controversy which such judgment shall have been S. 10629 30 1 rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislature that 2 this act would have been enacted even if such invalid provisions had not 3 been included herein. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately provided, however, that 5 the applicable effective date of Parts A through B of this act shall be 6 as specifically set forth in the last section of such Part.